Utah statutes.
32A-4-405.   Bond.
(1)  Each on-premise banquet licensee shall post a cash or corporate surety
bond in the penal sum of $10,000 payable to the department, which the licensee
has procured and must maintain for so long as the licensee continues to
operate as an on-premise banquet licensee.
(2)  The bond shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned
upon the licensee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the
commission.
(3) (a)  If the $10,000 surety bond is canceled due to the licensee's
negligence, a $300 reinstatement fee may be assessed.
(b)  No part of any cash or corporate bond so posted may be withdrawn during
the period the license is in effect, or while revocation proceedings are
pending against the licensee.
(c)  A bond filed by an on-premise banquet licensee may be forfeited if the
license is finally revoked.
